California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

58741.1.

Subject to Section 58993.1, the director may establish an educational program, as defined in Section 58608.1, directly affecting producers of all commodities produced in this state. If established, the educational program shall be created with all the powers, rights, and duties set forth in this chapter, except that it shall not be subject to Section 58749 or 58993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 385, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

58742.

The director may also, subject to the restriction and limitations which are contained in Article 7 (commencing with Section 58811) of this chapter, issue marketing orders which regulate the handling, processing, preparation for marketing, or marketing of any or all portions of any commodity which is produced in this state for which marketing regulatory powers are not being exercised by the federal government pursuant to the Marketing Agreement Act of 1937 (50 Stat. 249).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58743.

If the director finds that it tends to effectuate the declared purposes of this chapter within the standards which are prescribed in this chapter, the director may issue a marketing order, applicable to the marketing, within this state, of any commodity, which contains like terms, provisions, methods, and procedures as any license or order that regulates the marketing of such commodity in interstate or foreign commerce which is issued by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States pursuant to the provisions of any law or laws of the United States.

In selecting the members of any board or other advisory agency under such marketing order, the director shall, insofar as practicable, utilize the same persons as those serving in a similar capacity under such federal license or order, so as to avoid duplicating or conflicting personnel.

Any board, agency, or committee so appointed by the director shall be responsible to the director for the performance of such of their duties as relate to the administration of any such marketing order which is issued by the director pursuant to this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58744.

Any marketing order which is issued by the director pursuant to this chapter may be limited in its application by prescribing the marketing area or portion of the state in which it shall be effective. A marketing order shall not, however, be issued by the director unless it embraces all persons of a like class that are engaged in a specific and distinctive agricultural industry or trade within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58745.

In order to effectuate the declared policy of this chapter, the director may also, after due notice and opportunity for hearing, enter into marketing agreements with processors, distributors, producers, and others that are engaged in the handling of any commodity, which regulate the preparation for market and handling of such commodity. Such marketing agreements are binding upon the signatories to the agreements exclusively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58746.

The purposes and provisions of the chapter which relate to marketing orders are applicable to marketing agreements except as follows:

(a) Section 58779, which requires the preparation of an official list of the names and addresses of all producers and the volume of the commodity which was produced or marketed by all the producers in the preceding marketing season and a list of the names and addresses of all handlers and the volume of the commodity which was handled by all the handlers, during the preceding marketing season, is not applicable to marketing agreements.

(b) Sections 58991 to 58998, inclusive, and Sections 59082 to 59086, inclusive, are not applicable to marketing agreements. Prior to the issuance of any marketing agreement, or amendment to it, the director shall, however, find, in addition to the findings which are set forth in Section 58813, that the marketing agreement, or any amendment to it, has been assented to by a sufficient number of signatories that handle a sufficient volume of the commodity which is affected to accomplish the objectives of the agreement or amendment and provide sufficient moneys from assessments levied to defray the necessary expenses of formulation, issuance, administration, and enforcement.

(c) Section 59233 is not applicable to marketing agreements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58747.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 58605, the director may issue and make effective marketing orders or marketing agreements that affect handlers only which include only the provisions which are authorized in Sections 58889, 58890, 58892, 58893, and 58894, or any of such provisions, but no others, as may be applicable to the commodity that is regulated which is handled within this state, without regard to whether or not such commodity is produced within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58748.

If producers or handlers of any commodity which is regulated by a marketing order or marketing agreement that is issued by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter are required to comply with minimum quality, condition, size, or maturity regulations, no person may, except as otherwise provided in such order or agreement, process, distribute, or otherwise handle any of such commodity from any source, whether produced within or without this state, which commodity does not meet such minimum requirements applicable upon producers or handlers of such commodity in this state. Such regulations do not, however, apply to any commodity which has been produced outside of this state and is in transit on the effective date of the regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58749.

The director may issue and make effective a marketing order or marketing agreement which applies to two or more commodities. The producers or handlers of each commodity encompassed by such marketing order or agreement shall have all rights and privileges contained in this chapter as though such producers or handlers were directly affected by a marketing order or agreement regulating only a single commodity. If the producers or handlers of one commodity who are directly affected by a marketing order or agreement which applies to two or more commodities act to enjoin, amend, suspend or terminate the provisions thereof to such commodity, the order or agreement shall not be enjoined, amended, suspended or terminated with respect to any other commodity regulated by such order or agreement unless the director finds such injunction, amendment, suspension, or termination respecting one commodity makes continuance of the order or agreement no longer feasible or it fails to attain the objectives of this chapter. Unless the director makes findings to the contrary, a marketing order or agreement applicable to more than one commodity is deemed to be severable with respect to each commodity encompassed by it and also severable as to each sentence, clause, or part as it applies to each commodity. There shall be a clear and concise definition or identification of each commodity regulated by such multiple commodity marketing order or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 496.)
-------------------------------------------

58750.

(a) There is within the Department of Food and Agriculture a public and private collaboration known as the “Buy California Program.” The purposes of the program are to encourage consumer nutritional and food awareness and to foster purchases of high-quality California agricultural products.

(b) Pursuant to Section 58749, and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the secretary may issue and make effective a marketing agreement and be advised by those elements of the production agriculture and food processing industry willing to participate in the program via co-funding or in-kind contributions in a manner defined under the agreement.

(c) The department shall report to the Legislature on January 1, 2002, and each successive January 1 while this section is operative, regarding its expenditures, progress, and ongoing priorities with this program.

(d) The Buy California Account is created in the Food and Agriculture Fund and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, is continuously appropriated for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 118, Sec. 3.5.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Notice, Reports, and Hearings [58771. - 58788.]

58771.

If the director has reason to believe that the issuance of a marketing order, or amendments to an existing marketing order, will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this chapter with respect to any commodity, he shall, either upon his own motion or upon application of any producer or handler of such commodity, or any organization of such persons, give notice of not less than 30 days for a public hearing upon a proposed marketing order or such amendments to such existing marketing order. In an emergency situation requiring urgent action, the director may, upon citing the nature of the emergency in the notice, give less than 30 days’ notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

58773.

The director shall also mail a copy of such notice of hearing and a copy of such proposed marketing order, or proposed amendments, to every producer or handler of such commodity whose name and address appears upon lists of such persons, on file in the department that may be directly affected by the provisions of such proposed marketing order or such proposed amendments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58774.

The notice of hearing shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The date and place of the hearing.

(b) The commodity and the area which are covered by the proposed marketing order or the proposed amendments.

(c) A statement that the director will receive, at the hearing, testimony and evidence as to other necessary and relevant matters which are set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 58811).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 319, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58775.

To provide the director with accurate and reliable information, if that information is not then on file in the department, regarding the persons that may be directly affected by the provisions of any proposed marketing order for any commodity, the director shall, if he or she has reason to believe that the issuance of a marketing order will tend to effectuate the declared policy of this chapter, or upon receipt of a written application for a hearing pursuant to Section 58771, notify all handlers of the commodity to file with the director, within 30 days from the last date of the notice, a report, properly certified, which shows all of the following:

(a) The correct name and address of such handler.

(b) The quantities of the commodity that are affected by the proposed marketing order which were handled by the handler in the marketing season next preceding the filing of the report or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to handlers is complete.

(c) The correct name and address of every producer of the commodity, that may be directly affected by the proposed marketing order, from whom the handler received the commodity in the marketing season next preceding the filing of the report or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to handlers is complete.

(d) The director may also require all handlers to report quantities of the commodity which were received by the handler from each producer in the marketing season next preceding the filing of the report or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to handlers is complete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58777.

The director shall mail a copy of such notice to file such report to every handler of such commodity whose name and address appears upon the lists on file in the department, of handlers that may be directly affected by the provisions of such proposed marketing order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

58778.

Each handler of such commodity that may be directly affected by the provisions of such proposed marketing order shall file such verified report with the director within the time which is specified in Section 58775. Failure or refusal of any handler to file such report within the time which is specified does not invalidate any proceeding which is taken or marketing order which is issued pursuant to this chapter. The director shall proceed upon the basis of such information and reports as may otherwise be available.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58779.

From the reports which are filed and the information which is received or available to the director, including any proper corrections, the director shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of the producers and the volume of such commodity which was produced or marketed by all such producers and a list of the names and addresses of such handlers and the volume of such commodity which was handled by all such handlers, that are directly affected by the provisions of such proposed marketing order, or amendments to it, in the preceding marketing season. Such lists shall constitute complete and conclusive lists for use in any finding made by the director pursuant to the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 58991) of this chapter and such findings are conclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58780.

In the preparation of the list of producers or handlers to be used in the formulation or amendment of any marketing order or marketing agreement, the director may omit from such list the name of any person that makes only casual sales of the product which is involved, or whose sales or marketings of such product are incidental to urban home ownership, or the result of activity other than a commercial farm or business venture. Any person that is excluded from such lists is not subject to the provisions, including the payment of any assessments, which are applicable upon producers, or handlers, as prescribed in any such marketing order or marketing agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

58781.

The information which is contained in the individual reports of handlers which are filed with the director pursuant to this article shall not be made public by the director in such form but the information which is contained in such reports may be prepared in combined form for use by the director, his agents, or other interested persons, in the formulation, administration, and enforcement of a marketing order, or may be made available pursuant to court order. Such information shall not be made available to anyone for private purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58782.

The hearing on a proposed marketing order or proposed amendments shall be public and all testimony shall be received under oath. A full and complete record of all proceedings at such hearing shall be made and maintained on file in the office of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58783.

At the hearing, the director shall receive, in addition to other necessary or relevant matters, evidence upon the matters which are set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 58811).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58784.

At any public hearing which is held in connection with the formulation or amendment of a marketing order or marketing agreement, the director shall present testimony with respect to the procedure used to develop the official producer or handler list, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

58785.

At each public hearing upon a marketing order or a major amendment to it, the director shall receive evidence relative to the period of time which may be necessarily required for the filing, checking, and tabulating of written assents which are prescribed in Article 12 (commencing with Section 58991) of this chapter. He shall also, at the conclusion of each such hearing, make a finding, based upon the evidence, with respect to the period of time which may be reasonably and necessarily required for such filing, checking, and tabulating. On the basis of such finding, the director shall fix and limit the period during which such assents may be received by him and shall be the period at the time of mailing of assent forms to producers and handlers that are affected. If, however, the director finds that an extension of such period is reasonably warranted, he may extend such period for receiving assents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58786.

At a public hearing which is held to consider a proposed marketing order or major amendments to an existing marketing order, the director shall also receive evidence from which the director can determine whether the assent, approval, or favor of the producers, handlers, or processors affected shall be determined by written assents or by referendum as prescribed in Article 12 (commencing with Section 58991).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58787.

Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the director shall make a finding which is based upon the evidence received, whether assent, approval, or favor shall be determined by written assents or by referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

58788.

If the director finds that a referendum shall be had, the director shall direct that a referendum be held in accordance with Sections 58991 to 58998, inclusive. If a referendum is conducted, the director is not required, with respect to the assent, approval, or favor, to make a finding pursuant to Section 58785 concerning, or to fix and limit, the period during which assents may be received by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Findings [58811. - 58814.]

58811.

After the notice and hearing which are required by Article 6 (commencing with Section 58771) of this chapter, and before issuing a marketing order or amendments to it for the written assent of producers or handlers which contain provisions for correlating the supply of the commodity which is affected with market demands for it by means of restrictions upon the total quantity of such commodity, or restrictions upon the total quantity of any grade, size, quality, or condition of it, which restrictions have the effect of limiting the total quantity of such commodity which may be marketed during any marketing season, if the restricted portion of such commodity might otherwise be marketed by producers in compliance with other laws of this state or of the United States or in compliance with established commercial practice during such marketing season, the director shall make all of the following findings with respect to such marketing order or amendments to it:

(a) Such provisions are necessary in order to effect a reasonable correlation of the supply of the commodity which is affected with market demands for the commodity and that such marketing order or amendments to it will tend to reestablish or maintain such level of prices for such commodity as will provide a purchasing power for such commodity which is adequate to maintain in the business of producing such commodity such number of producers as is required to provide such supply of the quantities and qualities of such commodity as is necessary to fulfill the normal requirements of consumers of the commodity.

(b) Such marketing order or amendments to it will tend to approach such equality of purchasing power at as rapid a rate as is feasible in view of the market demand for such commodity.

(c) Such marketing order or amendments to it are in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and within the applicable limitations and restrictions which are set forth in this chapter and will tend to effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this chapter.

(d) Such marketing order or amendments to it will protect the interests of consumers of such commodity, by exercising the powers of this chapter only to such extent as is necessary to establish the equality of purchasing power which is described in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58812.

In making the findings with respect to any of the objectives which are set forth in Section 58811, the director shall, if any or all of the following economic factors are relevant, take into consideration any and all facts which are available to him with respect to all of the following:

(a) The quantity of such commodity which is available for distribution.

(b) The quantity of such commodity which is normally required by consumers.

(c) The cost of producing such commodity as determined by available statistics and surveys.

(d) The purchasing power of consumers as indicated by reports and indices.

(e) The level of prices of other commodities which compete with, or are utilized as substitutes for, such commodity.

(f) The level of prices of other commodities, services, and articles which farmers commonly buy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58813.

If the marketing order or amendments to it contain provisions only for the purpose of regulating the flow of the commodity, or any grade, size, or condition of the commodity, to market without directly restricting the total quantity which may be marketed during the marketing season, or if the marketing order or amendments to it contain provisions only for the establishment of grade, size, quality, or condition specifications, or for uniform grading and inspection, or the elimination of unfair trade practices, or provisions for advertising or sales promotion, or for research, the director may issue such marketing order or amendments to it if he makes all of the following findings:

(a) That such marketing order or amendments to it are reasonably calculated to attain the objectives which are sought in such marketing order.

(b) That such marketing order or amendments to it are in conformity with the provisions of this chapter and within the applicable limitations and restrictions which are set forth in this chapter and will tend to effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this chapter.

(c) That the interests of consumers of such commodity are protected in that the powers of this chapter are being exercised only to the extent which is necessary to attain such objectives.

In making any findings pursuant to this section, the director shall base his findings upon the facts, testimony, and evidence which is received at the public hearing together with any other relevant facts which are available to him from official publications or institutions of recognized standing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58814.

Any marketing order in effect on August 27, 1945, which was duly issued by the director pursuant to this chapter prior to May 28, 1945, and in effect on such date, shall continue in full force and effect and shall be conclusively presumed to be in conformity with the provisions of this article as amended.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Advisory Boards and Committees [58841. - 58853.]

58841.

Any marketing order which is issued pursuant to this chapter shall provide for the establishment of an advisory board to assist the director in the administration of any marketing order. The members of the advisory board shall be appointed by the director and may hold office at the pleasure of the director. A marketing order may, however, provide for the appointment of members from nominations made by the producers and handlers and may also provide for the method of selecting such nominees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58842.

If the marketing order affects directly only producers of a particular commodity, the members of the advisory board shall be producers. If the marketing order affects directly only handlers of a particular commodity, the members of the advisory board shall be handlers.

If the marketing order affects directly both producers and handlers of a particular commodity the advisory board shall be composed of both producers and handlers. The number of producers or handlers upon any such advisory board shall be of such number of producers or handlers as the director finds is necessary to assist properly in the administration of such order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58842.5.

Any raisin marketing order or agreement involving producers operating under this chapter shall provide for, and the director shall appoint, a person to represent cooperative bargaining associations organized pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 54401) of Division 20 from nominations made by the associations to the advisory board.

The person so appointed shall be a voting member of the advisory board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 654, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58843.

Upon the recommendation of the advisory board, the director may appoint one person who is neither a producer nor a handler to represent the department or the public generally.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58844.

A member of an advisory board is entitled to actual expenses which are incurred while engaged in performing duties that are authorized by this chapter and, with the approval of the advisory board concerned, may receive compensation not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) per day for each day spent in actual attendance at, or traveling to and from, meetings of the board or on special assignment for the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 395, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58845.

The director may authorize an advisory board to do all of the following:

(a) Enter into contracts or agreements.

(b) Employ necessary personnel, including attorneys engaged in the private practice of the law, and fix their compensation and terms of employment.

(c) Incur such expenses, to be paid from moneys which are collected as provided in Article 10 (commencing with Section 58921), as the director may deem necessary and proper to enable the advisory board properly to perform its duties as authorized by this chapter.

(d) Receive, invest, and disburse funds pursuant to the provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 58921).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 641, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58846.

The duties of an advisory board are administrative only and any such board may do only the following:

(a) Subject to the approval of the director, administer the marketing order. 

(b) Recommend to the director administrative rules and regulations which relate to the marketing order.

(c) Receive and report to the director complaints of violations of the marketing order.

(d) Recommend to the director amendments to the marketing order.

(e) Assist the director in the assessment of members of the industry and in the collection of funds to cover expenses incurred by the director in the administration of the marketing order.

(f) Assist the director in the collection of such necessary information and data as the director may deem necessary to the proper administration of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58846.5.

Each advisory board shall, annually, report to the members of the industry who are subject to its marketing order on the activities and program, including, but not limited to, the income and expenses, the fund balance, and a report of progress in achieving program goals, of such a marketing order, as prescribed by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 906.)
-------------------------------------------

58847.

The members or alternate members of any advisory board, including employees of the advisory board, are not responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any person for liability on any contract or agreement of the advisory board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58848.

In addition to the advisory board, one or more special committees or subcommittees may be established to assist the advisory board in carrying out its duties and functions. Upon approval of the director, each advisory board may establish committees or subcommittees to carry out assigned duties and functions and designate the members or alternate members of the advisory board to serve upon such committees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58849.

If the marketing order so authorizes, or upon the recommendation of the advisory board, the director may authorize the establishment of special committees or subcommittees of persons who are not members or alternate members of the board to perform specific duties and functions. The members and alternate members of any such special committee or subcommittee shall be appointed by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58850.

An advisory board may at any time invite any persons to their meetings to serve in an advisory capacity and the director may, if requested by the advisory board, pay necessary expenses to such persons at rates not to exceed those granted to advisory board members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58851.

Any action of any committee, special committee, or subcommittee of the board is subject to final approval by the advisory board. Members and alternate members of any committee, special committee, or subcommittee, whether by appointment or approval of the director, are entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses which are incurred while acting in their authorized capacities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58852.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the producers, or handlers, or both producers and handlers, appointed to any advisory board pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such advisory boards, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

58853.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11123 of the Government Code, all of the following shall apply to a meeting held by teleconference under this chapter by an advisory board:

(1) A member of the advisory board participating by teleconference shall be listed in the minutes of the meeting and shall provide notice of his or her participation by teleconference at least 24 hours before the meeting.

(2) The advisory board shall designate a primary physical meeting location where participants may physically attend the meeting and participate. At least one member of the advisory board shall be in attendance at the primary physical meeting location.

(3) The teleconference phone number, and, if applicable, the Internet Web site or other information indicating how the public can access the meeting remotely, shall be included in the agenda, which shall be available to the public.

(b) Nothing in this section shall exempt the advisory board from providing information regarding the physical location of an advisory board meeting or any teleconference participation information, including the identity of an advisory board member who might be participating by teleconference.

(c) Prior to holding a meeting by teleconference pursuant to this section, the advisory board shall adopt teleconferencing guidelines to address issues that include, but are not limited to, cancellations as a result of technical difficulties, ensuring transparency, and public
 participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 451, Sec. 2.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Terms of Marketing Orders [58881. - 58897.]

58881.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 58657 and 58747, any marketing order which is issued by the director pursuant to this chapter may contain any or all of the provisions which are prescribed by this article for regulating, or providing methods for regulating producer marketing, or the handling, or any of the operations of processing or distributing by handlers, of any commodity within the state, but no others.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58882.

A marketing order may contain provisions for determining the existence and extent of the surplus of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, and providing for the control and disposition of such surplus, and for equalizing the burden of such surplus elimination or control among the producers, processors, distributors, or other handlers that are affected.

Notwithstanding any other appropriate means of equalizing the burden of surplus control and its elimination as provided in this chapter, provision may be made for the creation of a stabilization fund to be used for purchasing or otherwise acquiring any portion of the surplus of any commodity either in fresh or processed form, except when processed in hermetically sealed containers, and for the diversion of such surplus quantity of such commodity which is so acquired into noncompetitive or byproducts uses or for disposing of such surplus in noncommercial channels. Money for such stabilization fund shall be provided by means of the establishment of an assessment rate for such purpose levied upon producers or handlers, or upon both producers and handlers. Such assessment rate shall be based upon the units in which such commodity is handled or marketed or upon any other uniform basis which the director determines to be reasonable and equitable. For convenience of collection, the director may collect any producer assessments from handlers of such commodity. Handlers paying such assessments for, and on behalf of, any producers may deduct such producer assessments from any money which is owed by such handlers to such producers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58883.

A marketing order may contain provisions for limiting the total quantity of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which may be marketed by producers, or processed, distributed, or otherwise handled within this state during any specified period by any and all persons that are engaged in such producer marketing, processing, distributing, or handling. Any such limitation shall be applied under a uniform rule which is applicable to all such persons so regulated. The total quantity of any such commodity which is so regulated and permitted to be marketed by producers, processed, distributed, or otherwise handled, shall not be less than the quantity which the director finds is reasonably necessary to supply the market demands of consumers of such commodity.

The marketing of green ripe olives is not, however, subject to any provisions of a marketing order which limits the total quantity of such commodity which may be marketed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58884.

A marketing order may contain provisions for allotting the quantity of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which each handler may purchase or acquire from, or handle on behalf of, any and all producers of the commodity, within this state during any specified period under a uniform rule, which is applicable to all handlers that are so regulated based upon the amounts produced or sold by such producers in a prior period which the director finds to be representative, or upon the current season’s production or sales of such producers, or both, to the end that the total quantity of such commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which is so purchased or handled within this state is apportioned equitably among the producers of the commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58885.

A marketing order may contain provisions for allotting the quantity of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which each handler may process, distribute, or handle within this state under a uniform rule, which is applicable to all handlers that are so regulated, which is based upon the quantities of such commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, of the current season’s crop which each such handler has available for such processing, distribution, or handling, or upon the quantities of such commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which is so processed, distributed, or handled by each such handler in a prior period which the director finds to be representative, or based upon both, to the end that the total quantity of such commodity, or any grade, size, or quality of it, processed, distributed, or handled within this state during any specified period is equitably apportioned among all such handlers of the commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58886.

A marketing order may contain provisions which regulate the period during which any commodity, or any grade, size, or quality of such commodity, may be processed, distributed, or otherwise marketed within this state by any and all persons that are engaged in such processing, distributing, or marketing within this state. The total quantity of such commodity which is so regulated and permitted to be processed, distributed, or otherwise marketed during such period, shall not, however, be less than the quantity which the director finds is necessary to reasonably supply the needs of consumers of such commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58887.
